Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1149.
do enact as follows:AB1149,11Section 1. 117.105 (4m) (e) 1. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1149,2,32117.105 (4m) (e) 1. a. The number of school board members under s. 120.01 3(1m) or 120.41.AB1149,24Section 2. 117.17 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1149,3,25117.17 (1) (a) Every order of school district reorganization under s. 117.08, 6117.09, or 117.105 that creates a new school district shall state the school districts 7which that are dissolved or from which territory is detached to create the new 8school district, name the new school district, state the type of school district and the 9grades to be taught by the new school district pursuant to s. 115.01 (2), (3), and (5), 10designate the number of school board members under s. 120.01 (1m) or 120.41, 11designate the terms of initial members of the school board under s. 120.02 (3) (a), 12designate the method of election of school board members under s. 120.06 or 120.42, 13direct the election of school board members under s. 120.06 or 120.42, insofar as 14applicable, designate the date of the first election of school board members, as 15provided under s. 117.22 (2) (b), and fix the time and place for the first annual 16meeting of the new school district, if one is to be held. The secretary of the board 17shall give notice of the first annual meeting, if one is to be held, under s. 120.08 (1) 1(c), and shall designate a person to act as temporary chairperson of the annual 2meeting until a chairperson is elected.AB1149,33Section 3. 119.08 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1149,3,54119.08 (title) Election of board members; nonvoting teacher 5representative.AB1149,46Section 4. 119.08 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:AB1149,3,117119.08 (1m) In addition to the members under sub. (1) (a), the board shall 8have one teacher representative selected as provided under s. 120.065. The teacher 9representative is not a member of the board and does not vote. The teacher 10representative is entitled to attend all board meetings, including any meeting 11convened in closed session under s. 19.85 (1).AB1149,512Section 5. 119.08 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1149,3,1513119.08 (3) The regular terms of board members shall be 4 years. 14Notwithstanding s. 120.065 (4), the regular term of the teacher representative shall 15be 4 years.AB1149,616Section 6. 119.10 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1149,3,2317119.10 (3) The board shall hold a regular meeting at least once each month at 18times fixed and published by the board in its rules. If a regular board meeting falls 19on a legal holiday, it shall be held on the next business day. Special meetings may 20be called and held as provided by the rules of the board. No business may be 21transacted at a special meeting other than that specified in the notice of the 22meeting, which shall be delivered personally or by mail to each member and the 23teacher representative at least 24 hours before the time of such meeting.AB1149,71Section 7. 120.01 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1149,4,32120.01 (title) Number of school board members; nonvoting teacher 3representative.AB1149,84Section 8. 120.01 of the statutes is renumbered 120.01 (1m).AB1149,95Section 9. 120.01 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB1149,4,106120.01 (2m) In addition to the members under sub. (1m), a school board of a 7common or union high school district shall have one teacher representative selected 8under s. 120.065. The teacher representative is not a member of the school board 9and does not vote. The teacher representative is entitled to attend all school board 10meetings, including any meeting convened in closed session under s. 19.85 (1).AB1149,1011Section 10. 120.065 of the statutes is created to read:AB1149,4,1412120.065 Selection of teacher representative. In a common or union high 13school district, the teacher representative to the school board shall be selected as 14follows:AB1149,4,1715(1) No later than the spring election, the teacher representative shall be 16selected by the employees of the school district who are employed in teaching roles 17by secret ballot.AB1149,4,1918(2) The teacher representative shall be an employee of the school district who 19is employed in a teaching role.AB1149,5,220(3) At least 30 days before a secret ballot is held under sub. (1), the school 21district clerk shall inform all school district employees who are eligible to serve as 22the teacher representative of the date of the secret ballot and shall solicit the names 23of candidates for the position. The school district clerk shall establish the timelines 1and procedures for providing notice of and conducting the secret ballot and for 2notifying interested persons regarding the result of the secret ballot.AB1149,5,73(4) The regular term of the teacher representative shall be for 3 years. A 4teacher representative selected for a regular or unexpired term shall take office on 5the 4th Monday in April. The selection process to fill an unexpired term shall be 6held in the same manner as the selection of a teacher representative under a 7regular term.AB1149,118Section 11. 120.11 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1149,5,209120.11 (2) (a) The school board shall hold a special school board meeting upon 10the written request of a school board member filed with the school district clerk or, 11in the school district clerk’s absence, the school district president. The school 12district clerk or, in the school district clerk’s absence, the president shall fix a 13reasonable date, time, and place for the meeting. Except as provided under pars. (b) 14and (c), the school district clerk or, in the school district clerk’s absence, the 15president shall notify each school board member and the teacher representative of 16the date, time, and place of the meeting at least 24 hours before the meeting. 17Except as provided under pars. (b) and (c), the school district clerk or, in the school 18district clerk’s absence, the president shall give the notice to each school board 19member and the teacher representative in a manner likely to give the school board 20member or teacher representative notice of the meeting.AB1149,1221Section 12. 120.11 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1149,6,522120.11 (2) (b) If the school district clerk or, in the school district clerk’s 23absence, the school district president determines that providing notice at least 24 1hours before a special school board meeting under par. (a) is, for good cause shown 2by the school district clerk or president, impossible or impractical, the school 3district clerk or president may notify each school board member and the teacher 4representative of the date, time, and place of the meeting less than 24 hours, but not 5less than 2 hours, before the meeting.AB1149,136Section 13. 120.11 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1149,6,117120.11 (2) (c) The school board may hold a special school board meeting under 8par. (a) without prior notice if all school board members and the teacher 9representative are present and consent or if every school board member and the 10teacher representative consents in writing even though the school board member or 11teacher representative does not attend.AB1149,1412Section 14. 120.13 (32) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1149,6,1813120.13 (32) School board orientation. Provide for the orientation and 14continuing education of school board members, the teacher representative, and 15persons who have been elected or selected under s. 120.065 to the school board but 16have not yet taken office in the general duties and responsibilities of the school 17board and the school district, and pay for the actual and necessary expenses 18incurred.AB1149,1519Section 15. 120.41 (3) of the statutes is created to read:AB1149,7,220120.41 (3) In addition to the members under sub. (1) or (2), a school board of 21a unified school district shall have one teacher representative selected under s. 22120.065. The teacher representative is not a member of the school board and does 1not vote. The teacher representative is entitled to attend all school board meetings, 2including any meeting convened in closed session under s. 19.85 (1).AB1149,7,33